Utah statutes.
4-18-6.   Agriculture Resource Development Fund -- Contents -- Use of fund
money.
(1)  There is created a revolving loan fund known as the Agriculture Resource
Development Fund.
(2)  The Agriculture Resource Development Fund shall consist of:
(a)  money appropriated to it by the Legislature;
(b)  sales and use tax receipts transferred to the fund pursuant to Section
59-12-103;
(c)  money received for the repayment of loans made from the fund;
(d)  money made available to the state for agriculture resource development
from any source; and
(e)  interest earned on the fund.
(3)  The commission shall make loans from the Agriculture Resource Development
Fund as provided by Section 4-18-5.
